Hawaii statutes.
[§26H‑2.5] Impact of inclusion.
The inclusion of any regulatory program into the provisions of this chapter
shall not be held to confer any regulatory authority or jurisdiction on any
department which does not otherwise have jurisdiction. In particular, the
department of commerce and consumer affairs shall not be conferred any
authority or jurisdiction not directly conferred by assignment of a regulatory
measure to that department. [L 1990, c 166, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next